North Carolina statutes. Chapter 45. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust.
ARTICLE 4. Satisfaction.
§ 45-36.23. Obligation release: content and effect.

A document is an obligation release if it does all of the following:

Identifies the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

States that the person signing the obligation release is the owner and holder of the obligation or obligations to be released.

Identifies one or more of the specific obligations that are secured by the security instrument and contains language confirming that, with respect to each such secured obligation, the obligation is no longer secured by the security instrument.

Is signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by the owner and holder of the specific obligation or obligations to be released.

The register of deeds shall accept an obligation release for recording unless one of the following applies:

The document is submitted by a method or in a medium not authorized for registration by the register of deeds under applicable law.

The required recording fee is not paid.

The document is not signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by the owner and holder of the obligation or obligations to be released. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning (i) the truth of the matters stated in any obligation release or (ii) the authority of the person executing any obligation release to do so.

From and after the date an obligation release is recorded, the obligation or obligations specifically identified and released in the obligation release (and only such obligation or obligations) shall no longer be secured by the security instrument, without regard to whether the obligation has been paid in full and satisfied. Unless the obligation release states that the secured obligation has been paid in full and satisfied, the recording of an obligation release does not by itself extinguish any liability of a person for payment or performance of the obligation or obligations released.

Secured obligations that are not specifically identified and released in an obligation release remain secured by the security instrument, and the recording of an obligation release does not extinguish any liability of a person for payment or performance of the remaining secured obligation or obligations. The recording of an obligation release has no effect on the lien of the security instrument on the real property described in the security instrument.

Unless the deed of trust provides otherwise, the trustee in a deed of trust is not a necessary party to an obligation release.

No particular phrasing is required for an obligation release. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of G.S. 45-36.23(a):

"OBLIGATION RELEASE

(G.S. 45-36.23)

The undersigned is now the owner and holder of the obligation(s) to be released by this instrument. As used in this release, the term "Security Instrument" refers to the security instrument identified as follows:
Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)
Original Grantor(s): (identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ________ at Page ________ or as document number ______________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina.
Secured obligations that are no longer secured. Each of the following obligations is no longer secured by the Security Instrument, without regard to whether the obligation has been paid in full and satisfied: (identify with particularity each secured obligation that will no longer be secured by the Security Instrument)
(Optional provision which may be used in addition to or in lieu of the paragraph above:)
Secured obligations that have been paid in full and satisfied. Each of the following obligations has been paid in full and satisfied and is consequently no longer secured by the Security Instrument: (identify with particularity each secured obligation that has been paid in full and satisfied and is consequently no longer secured by the Security Instrument)
Date: ____________________________
__________________________________
Signature of owner and holder of
the obligation(s) to be released

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]".

(2011-312, s. 10.)

§ 45-36.24. Expiration of lien of security instrument.

Maturity Date. - For purposes of this section:

If a secured obligation is for the payment of money:

If all remaining sums owing on the secured obligation are due and payable in full on a date specified in the secured obligation, the maturity date of the secured obligation is the date so specified. If no such date is specified in the secured obligation, the maturity date of the secured obligation is the last date a payment on the secured obligation is due and payable under the terms of the secured obligation.

If all remaining sums owing on the secured obligation are due and payable in full on demand or on a date specified in the secured obligation, whichever first occurs, the maturity date of the secured obligation is the date so specified. If all sums owing on the secured obligation are due and payable in full on demand and no alternative date is specified in the secured obligation for payment in full, the maturity date of the secured obligation is the date of the secured obligation.

The maturity date of the secured obligation is "stated" in a security instrument if (i) the maturity date of the secured obligation is specified as a date certain in the security instrument, (ii) the last date a payment on the secured obligation is due and payable under the terms of the secured obligation is specified in the security instrument, or (iii) the maturity date of the secured obligation or the last date a payment on the secured obligation is due and payable under the terms of the secured obligation can be ascertained or determined from information contained in the security instrument, such as, for example, from a payment schedule contained in the security instrument.

If the secured obligation is for the performance of some obligation other than the payment of money:

If the secured obligation is required to be performed by a date specified in the secured obligation, the maturity date of the secured obligation is the date so specified.

If the obligation is to be performed on demand or before a date specified in the secured obligation, whichever first occurs, the maturity date of the secured obligation is the date so specified. If the obligation is to be performed on demand and no alternative date for performance is specified in the secured obligation, the maturity date of the secured obligation is the date of the secured obligation.

The maturity date of the secured obligation is "stated" in a security instrument if (i) the maturity date of the secured obligation is specified as a date certain in the security instrument or (ii) the maturity date of the secured obligation can be ascertained or determined from information contained in the security instrument.

Automatic Lien Expiration. - Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, unless the lien of a security instrument has been extended in the manner prescribed in subsection (c), (d), or (e) of this section, the security instrument has been foreclosed, or the security instrument has been satisfied of record pursuant to

G.S. 45-37

, the lien of a security instrument automatically expires, and the security instrument is conclusively deemed satisfied of record pursuant to

G.S. 45-37

, at the earliest of the following times:

If the security instrument was first recorded before October 1, 2011:

If the maturity date of the secured obligation is stated in the security instrument, 15 years after the maturity date.

If the maturity date of the secured obligation is not stated in the security instrument, 35 years after the date the security instrument was recorded in the office of the register of deeds.

Without regard to whether the maturity date of the secured obligation is stated in the security instrument, 15 years from whichever of the following occurs last:

The date when the conditions of the security instrument were required by its terms to have been performed.

The date of maturity of the last installment of debt or interest secured thereby.

The date an affidavit or separate instrument was recorded pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 45-37(b), if any such affidavit or separate instrument was recorded before October 1, 2011, and before the lien of the security instrument expired.

If the security instrument was first recorded on or after October 1, 2011:

If the maturity date of the secured obligation is stated in the security instrument, 15 years after the maturity date.

If the maturity date of the secured obligation is not stated in the security instrument, 35 years after the date the security instrument was recorded in the office of the register of deeds.

Methods To Extend a Lien. - The lien of a recorded security instrument may be extended one or more times by recording (i) a lien maturity extension agreement or (ii) a notice of maturity date. If more than one lien maturity extension agreement or notice of maturity date is recorded, the most recently recorded lien maturity extension agreement or notice of maturity date controls in determining when the lien of a security instrument expires. A lien maturity extension agreement or notice of maturity date is ineffective unless recorded before the lien expires. The lien of the original security instrument may not be extended to a date more than 50 years after the date the security instrument was originally recorded in the office of the register of deeds without the written agreement of the then owner of the property encumbered by the lien of the security instrument.

Lien Maturity Extension Agreement. -

The lien of a recorded security instrument may be extended to a date specified in a lien maturity extension agreement, provided the lien maturity extension agreement is recorded before the lien expires. When a lien maturity extension agreement has been duly recorded, the lien of the security instrument will expire on the date specified in the lien maturity extension agreement.

A document (including any document that modifies, amends, or restates a security instrument) is a lien maturity extension agreement if it does all of the following:

Identifies the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

States the date to which the lien of the security instrument is extended.

Is signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by the secured creditor and the then owner of the property encumbered by the lien of the security instrument.

No particular phrasing is required for a lien maturity extension agreement. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements for a lien maturity extension agreement:

Notice of Maturity Date. -

The lien of a recorded security instrument may be extended by a notice of maturity date, provided the notice of maturity date is recorded before the lien expires.

When a notice of maturity date signed only by the secured creditor has been duly recorded, the lien of the security instrument will expire at the earliest of the following times: (i) 15 years after the maturity of the secured obligation as stated in the notice of maturity date or (ii) 50 years after the date the security instrument was originally recorded in the office of the register of deeds. A document signed only by the secured creditor is a notice of maturity date if it does all of the following:

Identifies the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

States that the person signing the notice of maturity date is the secured creditor.

States the maturity date of the secured obligation.

Is signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by the secured creditor.

When a notice of maturity date signed by the secured creditor and by the then owner of the property encumbered by the lien of the security instrument has been duly recorded, the lien of the security instrument will expire 15 years after the maturity date of the secured obligation as stated in the notice of maturity. A document (including any document that modifies, amends, or restates a security instrument) signed by the secured creditor and by the then owner of the property encumbered by the lien of the security instrument is a notice of maturity date if it:

Identifies the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

States the maturity date of the secured obligation.

Is signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by the secured creditor and the then owner of the property encumbered by the lien of the security instrument.

No particular phrasing is required for a notice of maturity date. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements for a notice of maturity date signed only by the secured creditor:

Exception. - The register of deeds shall accept a lien maturity extension agreement or a notice of maturity date for recording and index the document as a subsequent instrument in accordance with

G.S. 161-14.1

, unless one of the following applies:

The document is submitted by a method or in a medium not authorized for registration by the register of deeds under applicable law.

The required recording fee is not paid.

The document is not signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning (i) the truth of the matters stated in the document, (ii) whether the parties to the document are in fact the secured creditor and the then owner of the real property encumbered by the lien of the security instrument, or (iii) the authority of any person executing the document to do so.

Foreclosure Proceedings. - No proceeding may be commenced to foreclose the lien of a security instrument unless the proceeding is commenced prior to the date on which the lien of the security instrument expires. However, if a proceeding to foreclose the lien of a security instrument is commenced before the lien of the security instrument expires, the lien created by the security instrument shall continue until final disposition of the proceeding. This provision shall not be construed as extending the lien or the right to bring or maintain any action for which a shorter period may be provided by law.

No Shortening of Lien Without Secured Creditor's Consent. - Subject to the provisions of

G.S. 45-37

, the duration of the lien of a security instrument may not be shortened without the consent of the secured creditor.

No Release or Satisfaction Necessary. - No release, satisfaction, or other instrument is necessary to discharge the lien of a security instrument that has expired; however, nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting or preventing the execution and recordation of any such release, satisfaction, or other document.

Trustee in a Deed of Trust. - For purposes of this section, the trustee or substitute trustee in a deed of trust (i) shall not be considered the owner of the property encumbered by the lien of the deed of trust and (ii) shall not be a necessary party to a lien maturity extension agreement or notice of maturity date.

Applicability. - This section applies to all security instruments, whether recorded before, on, or after October 1, 2011, except the following:

Any security instrument securing the payment of money or securing the performance of any other obligation or obligations conclusively presumed to have been fully paid and performed pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 45-37(b) prior to October 1, 2011.

Any security instrument made or given by any railroad company, or any agreement of conditional sale, equipment trust agreement, lease, chattel mortgage, or other instrument relating to the sale, purchase, or lease of railroad equipment or rolling stock, or of other personal property.

"LIEN MATURITY EXTENSION AGREEMENT

(G.S. 45-36.24(d))

______________ is now the secured creditor under the security instrument identified as follows:
Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)
Original Grantor(s): (identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ________ at Page ________ or as document number ________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina.
__________________ is now the owner of the real property encumbered by the lien of the security instrument.
Pursuant to G.S. 45-36.24(d), the lien of the security instrument is extended to and including ____________________________ (specify date).
Date: ____________________________
________________________
___________________________
Signature of Current Owner
Signature of Secured Creditor
Owner of Real Property

[Acknowledgments before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]"

"NOTICE OF MATURITY DATE

(G.S. 45-36.24(e))

The undersigned is now the secured creditor under the security instrument identified as follows:
Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)
Original Grantor(s): (identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ________ at Page ________ or as document number ________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina.
The maturity date of the secured obligation is ______________ (specify date).
Date: ________________________
____________________________
Signature(s) of secured creditor

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]"

(2011-312, s. 11; 2013-204, s. 2.8.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2013-204, s. 2.8, effective June 26, 2013, in sub-subdivision (b)(1)b., added "of the secured obligation" and deleted "or acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property, whichever is later" following "register of deeds"; and deleted "or October 1, 2011, whichever is later" following "register of deeds" in sub-subdivision (b)(2)b.

§ 45-37. Satisfaction of record of security instruments.

Subject to the provisions of G.S. 45-36.9(a) and

G.S. 45-73

relating to security instruments which secure future advances, any security instrument intended to secure the payment of money or the performance of any other obligation registered as required by law may be satisfied of record and thereby discharged and released of record in the following manner:

Security instruments satisfied of record prior to October 1, 2005, pursuant to this subdivision as it was in effect prior to October 1, 2005, shall be deemed satisfied of record, discharged, and released.

Security instruments satisfied of record prior to October 1, 2011, pursuant to this subdivision as it was in effect prior to October 1, 2011, shall be deemed satisfied of record, discharged, and released.

Security instruments satisfied of record prior to October 1, 2011, pursuant to this subdivision as it was in effect prior to October 1, 2011, shall be deemed satisfied of record, discharged, and released.

Security instruments satisfied of record prior to October 1, 2011, pursuant to this subdivision as it was in effect prior to October 1, 2011, shall be deemed satisfied of record, discharged, and released.

Security instruments satisfied of record prior to October 1, 2005, pursuant to this subdivision as it was in effect prior to October 1, 2005, shall be deemed satisfied of record, discharged, and released.

Security instruments satisfied of record prior to October 1, 2005, pursuant to this subdivision as it was in effect prior to October 1, 2005, shall be deemed satisfied of record, discharged, and released.

By recording:

A satisfaction document that satisfies the requirements of

G.S. 45-36.10

,

An affidavit of satisfaction that satisfies the requirements of

G.S. 45-36.16

, or

A trustee's satisfaction that satisfies the requirements of

G.S. 45-36.20

, but only if the security instrument is a deed of trust.

The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning (i) the truth of the matters stated in any satisfaction document, affidavit of satisfaction, or trustee's satisfaction, or (ii) the authority of the person executing any satisfaction document, affidavit, or trustee's satisfaction to do so.

It shall be conclusively presumed that the conditions of any security instrument recorded before October 1, 2011, securing the payment of money or securing the performance of any other obligation or obligations have been complied with or the debts secured thereby paid or obligations performed, as against creditors or purchasers for valuable consideration from the mortgagor or grantor, from and after the expiration of 15 years from whichever of the following occurs last:

The date when the conditions of the security instrument were required by its terms to have been performed, or

The date of maturity of the last installment of debt or interest secured thereby;

provided that on or before October 1, 2011, and before the lien has expired pursuant to this subsection, the holder of the indebtedness secured by the security instrument or party secured by any provision thereof may file an affidavit with the register of deeds which affidavit shall specifically state:

(1) The amount of debt unpaid, which is secured by the security instrument; or

(2) In what respect any other condition thereof shall not have been complied with; or

may record a separate instrument signed by the secured creditor and witnessed by the register of deeds stating:

(1) Any payments that have been made on the indebtedness or other obligation secured by the security instrument including the date and amount of payments and

(2) The amount still due or obligations not performed under the security instrument.

The effect of the filing of the affidavit or the recording of a separate instrument made as herein provided shall be to postpone the effective date of the conclusive presumption of satisfaction to a date 15 years from the filing of the affidavit or from the recording of the separate instrument. There shall be only one postponement of the effective date of the conclusive presumption provided for herein. The register of deeds shall record and index the affidavit provided for herein or the separate instrument made as herein provided as a subsequent instrument in accordance with

G.S. 161-14.1

. This subsection shall not apply to any security instrument made or given by any railroad company, or to any agreement of conditional sale, equipment trust agreement, lease, chattel mortgage or other instrument relating to the sale, purchase or lease of railroad equipment or rolling stock, or of other personal property.

The lien of any security instrument that secured the payment of money or the performance of any other obligation or obligations and that was conclusively presumed to have been fully paid and performed prior to October 1, 2011, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection is conclusively deemed to have expired and shall be of no further force or effect. No release, satisfaction, or other instrument is necessary to discharge the lien of a security instrument that has expired; however, nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting or preventing the execution and recordation of any such release, satisfaction, or other document.

This subsection shall apply only to security instruments securing the payment of money or securing the performance of any other obligation or obligations that were conclusively presumed pursuant to this subsection to have been fully paid and performed prior to October 1, 2011. All other security instruments shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 45-36.24

.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 114, s. 4.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1.

Any transaction subject to the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, Chapter 25 of the General Statutes, is controlled by the provisions of that act and not by this section.

Whenever this section requires a signature or endorsement, that signature or endorsement shall be followed by the name of the person signing or endorsing the document printed, stamped, or typed so as to be clearly legible.

The satisfaction of record of a security instrument pursuant to this section shall operate and have the same effect as a duly executed and recorded deed of release or reconveyance of the property described in the security instrument and shall release and discharge (i) all the interest of the secured creditor in the real property arising from the security instrument and, (ii) if the security instrument is a deed of trust, all the interest of the trustee or substitute trustee in the real property arising from the deed of trust.

(1870-1, c. 217; Code, s. 1271; 1891, c. 180; 1893, c. 36; 1901, c. 46; Rev., s. 1046; 1917, c. 49, s. 1; c. 50, s. 1; C.S., s. 2594; 1923, c. 192, s. 1; c. 195; 1935, c. 47; 1945, c. 988; 1947, c. 880; 1951, c. 292, s. 1; 1967, c. 765, ss. 1-5; 1969, c. 746; 1975, c. 305; 1985, c. 219; 1987, c. 405, s. 1; c. 620, s. 1; 1989, c. 434, s. 1; 1991, c. 114, s. 4; 1995, c. 292, ss. 1, 2, 5; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 604, s. 1; 2005-123, s. 1; 2006-226, s. 12; 2006-259, ss. 2, 3; 2006-264, s. 40(b); 2011-246, s. 4; 2011-312, s. 12.)

Local Modification.

- Dare: 1957, c. 464.

Cross References.

- As to requirement of registration for mortgages, deeds of trust, etc., see

G.S. 47-20

.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote this section.

Session Laws 2006-226, s. 12, effective August 10, 2006, inserted "prior to October 1, 2005" the first time it appears in subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(5), and (a)(6).

Session Laws 2006-264, s. 40(b), effective October 10, 2005, inserted "prior to October 1, 2005" the first time it appears in subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(5), and (a)(6).

Session Laws 2011-246, s. 4, effective October 1, 2011, rewrote subdivisions (a)(2) through (a)(4). See Editor's note for former provisions.

Session Laws 2011-312, s. 12, effective October 1, 2011, in subsection (b), in the introductory paragraph, inserted "recorded before October 1, 2011," in the paragraph following the first subdivision (b)(2), inserted "on or before October 1, 2011, and before the lien has expired pursuant to his subsection," and added the last two paragraphs.

Legal Periodicals.

- For brief comment on the 1947 amendment, see 25 N.C.L. Rev. 407 (1947).

For brief comment on the 1951 amendment, see 29 N.C.L. Rev. 408 (1951).

For article concerning the quest for clear land titles in North Carolina, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 89 (1965).

§ 45-37.1. Validation of certain entries of cancellation made by beneficiary or assignee instead of trustee.

In all cases where, prior to January 1, 1930, it appears from the margin or face of the record in the office of the register of deeds of any county in this State that the original beneficiary named in any deed of trust, trust indenture, or other instrument intended to secure the payment of money and constituting a lien on real estate, or his assignee of record, shall have made an entry purporting to fully satisfy and discharge the lien of such instrument, and such entry has been signed by the original payee and beneficiary in said deed of trust, or other security instrument, or by his assignee of record, or by his or their properly constituted officer, agent, attorney, or legal representatives, and has been duly witnessed by the register of deeds or his deputy, all such entries of cancellation and satisfaction are hereby validated and made full, sufficient and complete to release, satisfy and discharge the lien of such instrument, and shall have the same effect as if such entry had been made and signed by the trustee named in said deed of trust, or other security instrument, or by his duly appointed successor or substitute.

(1945, c. 986.)

§ 45-37.2. Indexing satisfactions and other documents relating to security instruments.

The register of deeds shall record and index the following instruments in accordance with

G.S. 161-14.1

:

A substitution of trustee.

A document of rescission recorded pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.6

.

A deed of release or reconveyance.

A partial release recorded pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.22

.

An obligation release recorded pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.23

.

A satisfaction document, affidavit of satisfaction, or trustee's satisfaction recorded pursuant to G.S. 45-37(a)(7).

A lien maturity extension agreement or notice of maturity date recorded pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.24

.

No fee shall be charged by the register of deeds for recording a satisfaction document, affidavit of satisfaction, or a trustee's satisfaction.

G.S. 161-14.1

(1963, c. 1021, s. 1; 1967, c. 765, s. 6; 1987, c. 620, s. 2; 1991, c. 114, s. 2; 1993, c. 425, s. 3; 1995, c. 292, s. 6; 2005-123, s. 1; 2011-246, s. 5; 2011-312, s. 13.)

Editor's Note.

- This section was amended by Session Laws 2011-246, s. 5 and by Session Laws 2011-312, s. 13, in the coded bill drafting format provided by

G.S. 120-20.1

. Session Laws 2011-246, s. 5, effective October 1, 2011, deleted subsection (b), but failed to
account for the changes made by Session Laws 2011-312, s. 13, which updated a section reference in subsection (b). Subsection (b) has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote the heading and text of the section.

Session Laws 2011-246, s. 5, effective October 1, 2011, in the section catchline, substituted "Indexing" for "Recording"; deleted the subsection (a) designation; and deleted subsection (b), which pertained to security instruments and contained the "Record of Satisfaction" form.

Session Laws 2011-312, s. 13, effective October 1, 2011, rewrote the section catchline, which formerly read: "Recording satisfactions of security instruments"; rewrote the first paragraph of subsection (a), which formerly read: "When a satisfaction document, affidavit of satisfaction, or trustee's satisfaction is recorded pursuant to G.S. 45-37(a)(7), the register of deeds shall record and index the instrument in accordance with

G.S. 161-14.1

"; added subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(7); and corrected a section reference in subsection (b).

§ 45-38. Recording of foreclosure.

In case of foreclosure of any deed of trust, or mortgage, the trustee, mortgagee, or the trustee's or mortgagee's attorney shall record a notice of foreclosure that includes the date when, and the person to whom, a conveyance was made by reason of the foreclosure. In the event the entire obligation secured by a mortgage or deed of trust is satisfied by a sale of only a part of the property embraced within the terms of the mortgage or deed of trust, the trustee, mortgagee, or the trustee's or mortgagee's attorney shall indicate in the notice of foreclosure which property was sold.

A notice of foreclosure shall consist of a separate instrument, or that part of the original deed of trust or mortgage rerecorded, reciting the information required hereinabove, the names of the original parties to the original instrument foreclosed, and the recording data for the instrument foreclosed. A notice of foreclosure shall be indexed by the register of deeds in accordance with

G.S. 161-14.1

.

(1923, c. 192, s. 2; C.S., s. 2594(a); 1949, c. 720, s. 2; 1963, c. 1021, s. 2; 1971, c. 985; 1991, c. 114, s. 3; 1993, c. 305, s. 24; 2005-123, s. 1; 2006-226, s. 13.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2006-226, s. 13, effective August 10, 2006, substituted "foreclosure" for "forfeiture," and "G.S. 161-14.1" for "G.S. 161.14.1" in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

Legal Periodicals.

- For brief comment on the 1949 amendment, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 479 (1949).

For article, "The Paper Chase:
Securization, Foreclosure, and the Uncertainty of Mortgage Title," see 63 Duke L. J. 637 (2013).

§ 45-39: Repealed by Session Laws 1949, c. 720, s. 5.

§ 45-41. Recorded deed of release of mortgagee's representative.

The personal representative of any mortgagee or trustee in any mortgage or deed of trust which has heretofore or which may hereafter be registered in the manner required by the laws of this State may satisfy of record, discharge and release the same and all property thereby conveyed by deed of quitclaim, release or conveyance executed, acknowledged and recorded as is now prescribed by law for the execution, acknowledgment and registration of deeds and mortgages in this State.

(1909, c. 283, s. 1; C.S., s. 2596; 2005-123, s. 1.)

Cross References.

- For provisions regarding probate and registration of deeds and mortgages, etc., see

G.S. 47-1

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1, effective October 1, 2005, inserted "satisfy of record" near the middle of the section.

§ 45-42. Satisfaction of corporate mortgages by corporate officers.

All security instruments executed to a corporation may be satisfied and so marked of record as by law provided for the satisfaction of security instruments, by any officer of the corporation indicating the office held. For the purposes of recordation and satisfaction, such signature shall be deemed to be a certification by the signer that he is an officer and is authorized to execute the satisfaction on behalf of such corporation. Where security instruments were marked "satisfied" on the records before the twenty-third day of February, 1909, by any president, secretary, treasurer or cashier of any corporation by such officer writing his own name and affixing thereto the title of his office in such corporation, such satisfaction is validated, and is as effective to all intents and purposes as if a deed of release duly executed by such corporation had been made, acknowledged and recorded.

(1909, c. 283, ss. 2, 3; C.S., s. 2597; 1935, c. 271; 1963, c. 193; 1991, c. 647, s. 6; 2005-123, s. 1.)

§ 45-42.1. Corporate cancellation of lost mortgages by register of deeds.

Upon affidavit of the secretary and treasurer of a corporation showing that the records of such corporation show that such corporation has fully paid and satisfied all of the notes secured by a security instrument executed by such corporation and such payment and satisfaction was made more than 25 years ago, and that such security instrument was made to a corporation which ceased to exist more than 25 years ago, and such affidavit shall further state that the records of such corporation show that no payments have been made on such secured obligation by the corporation executing such security instrument for 25 years, the register of deeds of the county in which such security instrument is recorded is authorized to record the affidavit. The register of deeds shall index the affidavit according to

G.S. 161-22

using the names of parties stated in the affidavit and shall make reference to the recording data of the original security instrument as stated in the affidavit opposite the name of each party so indexed. Upon recording such affidavit, the said security instrument shall be deemed to be cancelled and satisfied of record: Provided, that this section shall not apply to any mortgagor corporation except those in which the State of North Carolina owns more than a majority of the capital stock and shall not apply to any security instrument in which the principal amount secured thereby exceeds the sum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000): Provided, such cancellation shall not bar any action to foreclose such security instrument instituted within 90 days after the same is cancelled.

(1945, c. 1090; 1991, c. 114, s. 7; 2005-123, s. 1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1, substituted "security instrument" for "mortgage or deed of trust" throughout the section; substituted "secured obligation" for "mortgage" in the first sentence; inserted the present second sentence; and rewrote the introductory language preceding the proviso in the present third sentence.